Utah statutes.
77-16a-301.   Mental examination of defendant

(1) (a)  When the court receives notice that a defendant intends to claim that the defendant is not guilty by reason of insanity or that the defendant had diminished mental capacity, or that the defendant intends to assert special mitigation under Subsection 76-5-205.5(1)(a), the court shall order the Department of Human Services to examine the defendant and investigate the defendant's mental condition.

(b)  The person or organization directed by the department to conduct the examination shall testify at the request of the court or either party in any proceeding in which the testimony is otherwise admissible.

(c)  Pending trial, unless the court or the executive director directs otherwise, the defendant shall be retained in the same custody or status the defendant was in at the time the examination was ordered.

(2) (a)  The defendant shall be available and shall fully cooperate in the examination by the department and any other independent examiners for the defense and the prosecuting attorney.

(b)  If the defendant fails to be available and to fully cooperate, and that failure is established to the satisfaction of the court at a hearing prior to trial, the defendant is barred from presenting expert testimony relating to the defendant's defense of mental illness at the trial of the case.

(c)  The department shall complete the examination within 30 days after the court's order, and shall prepare and provide to the court prosecutor and defense counsel a written report concerning the condition of the defendant.

(3)  Within 10 days after receipt of the report from the  department, but not later than five days before the trial of the case, or at any other time the court directs, the prosecuting attorney shall file and serve upon the defendant a notice of rebuttal of the defense of mental illness, which shall contain the names of witnesses the prosecuting attorney proposes to call in rebuttal.

(4)  The reports of any other independent examiner are admissible as evidence upon stipulation of the prosecution and defense.

(5)  This section does not prevent any party from producing any other testimony as to the mental condition of the defendant.  Expert witnesses who are not appointed by the court are not entitled to compensation under Subsection (7).

(6)  This section does not require the admission of evidence not otherwise admissible.

(7)  Expenses of examination ordered by the court under this section shall be paid by the Department of Human Services.  Travel expenses associated with the examination incurred by the defendant shall be charged by the department to the county where prosecution is commenced. Examination of defendants charged with violation of municipal or county ordinances shall be charged by the department to the entity commencing the prosecution.



Amended by Chapter 206, 2009 General Session

